Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB398.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 278.264 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commission shall have the authority to approve or
deny the retirement of an electric generating unit owned by a utility. Prior to retiring an electric generating
unit, a utility shall apply to the commission for an order approving the retirement, and shall give the
commission thirty (30) days' notice of the application. The application shall include a statement certifying the
applicant's compliance with the requirements of KRS 164.2807. The commission shall enter an order
approving, approving with conditions, or denying the application within one hundred eighty (180) days of
receiving an administratively complete application.
(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption against the retirement of a fossil fuel-fired electric generating unit.
Subject to the provisions of subsection (6) of this section, the commission shall not approve the retirement of
an electric generating unit, authorize a surcharge for the decommissioning of the unit, or take any other action
which authorizes or allows for the recovery of costs for the retirement of an electric generating unit, including
any stranded asset recovery, unless the presumption created by this section is rebutted by evidence sufficient
for the commission to find that:
(a) The utility will replace the retired electric generating unit with new electric generating capacity that:
1. Is dispatchable by either the utility or the regional transmission organization or independent
system operator responsible for balancing load within the utility's service area;
2. Maintains or improves the reliability and resilience of the electric transmission grid;
3. Maintains the minimum reserve capacity requirement established by the utility's reliability
coordinator; and
4. Has the same or higher capacity value and net capability, unless the utility can demonstrate that
such capacity value and net capability is not necessary to provide reliable service;
(b) The retirement will not harm the utility's ratepayers by causing the utility to incur any net incremental
costs to be recovered from ratepayers that could be avoided by continuing to operate the electric
generating unit proposed for retirement in compliance with applicable law;
(c) The decision to retire the fossil fuel-fired electric generating unit is not the result of any financial
incentives or benefits offered by any federal agency; and
(d) The utility shall not commence retirement or decommissioning of the electric generating unit until the
replacement generating capacity meeting the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection is fully
constructed, permitted, and in operation, unless the utility can demonstrate that it is necessary under the
circumstances to commence retirement or decommissioning of the existing unit earlier.
(3) The utility shall at a minimum provide the commission with evidence of all known direct and indirect costs of
retiring the electric generating unit, as well as all costs and depreciation expenses recovered pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section, and demonstrate that cost savings will result to customers as a result of the
retirement of the electric generating unit.
(4) The commission shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Legislative Research Commission by
December 1 of each year detailing:
(a) The number of requests by utilities to retire electric generating units in the Commonwealth, the
nameplate capacity of each of those units, and whether the request was approved or denied by the
commission;
(b) The impact of any commission-approved retirement of an electric generating unit on the:
1. Commonwealth's generation fuel mix;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Required capacity reserve margins for the utility;
3. Need for capacity additions or expansions at new or existing facilities as a result of the
retirement; and
4. Need for additional purchase power or capacity reserve arrangements; and
(c) Whether the retirement resulted in stranded costs for the ratepayer that will be recovered by the utility
through a surcharge or some other separate charge on the customer bill.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Dispatchable" means a source of electric power generation that is available on demand, that is not
intermittent, and that can be adjusted to increase or decrease its power output upon request of a power
grid operator or otherwise upon demand or request, or that can have its power output adjusted in
response to market or system needs; and
(b) "Intermittent" means:
1. A source of electric power generation from a solar photovoltaic, solar thermal heating,
concentrating solar thermal collector, or other solar energy collection or generation system;
2. A source of electric power that generates energy by harnessing wind power or energy, whether
through a turbine or other device;
3. Geothermal energy, biomass energy, anaerobic digestion, or combined heat and power from
solar, wind, geothermal, or anaerobic digestion sources;
4. Any short duration energy storage, which includes any method of storing generated electricity
for later dispatch to the grid, whether alone or in conjunction with any other intermittent sources
described in this paragraph, that is equivalent to less than forty-eight (48) hours of the average
peak generation of the unit it is used to offset; or
5. Conventional hydropower and pumped storage hydropower, unless they are capable of providing
energy on demand, in which case they shall be deemed to be dispatchable.
(6) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, this section shall not be construed as limiting
the commission's authority to approve a utility's right to record and seek, prior to retirement
authorization, the recovery of any electric generating unit's decommissioning, removal and salvage
costs, and depreciation expenses through rates over the electric generating unit's estimated
depreciable life.
(b) Approval to recover any costs or expenses under this subsection shall not be considered approval of,
or support for, retirement or approval of timing of retirement of an electric generating unit in any
proceeding considering a retirement application filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
Became law without Governor's signature April 12, 2026.